Montana, session 2025, HB738.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Procedure for adoption of regulations and boundaries. The board of
county commissioners shall observe the following procedures in the establishment or revision of boundaries for
zoning districts and in the adoption or amendment of zoning regulations:
(1) Notice of a public hearing on the proposed zoning district boundaries and of regulations for the
zoning district must:
(a) state the following:
(i) the boundaries of the existing or proposed district;
(ii) the general character of the proposed zoning regulations;
(iii) the date, time, and place of the public hearing;
(iv) the name, address, and telephone number of the person or office that may be contacted for
further information on the action to be taken;
(v) that the proposed zoning regulations are on file for public inspection at the office of the county
clerk and recorder and are posted on the county's website; and
(vi) the county's website address where the proposed zoning regulations are available for public
inspection;
(b) be posted not less than 45 days before the public hearing in at least five public places,
including but not limited to public buildings and adjacent to public rights-of-way, within the proposed district;
(c) be published once a week for 2 weeks in a newspaper of general circulation within the county;
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 738

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 738.1
and
(d) be mailed to all residents within the zoning district or subdistrict whose addresses are known to
the county not less than 15 days and not more than 45 days prior to the public hearing through any of the
following methods:
(i) depositing the notice, properly addressed, in the United States mail with postage paid at the
first-class rate;
(ii) sending the notice by certified mail rather than first class;
(iii) mailing the notice at the bulk rate; or
(iv) mailing a postcard.
(2) At the public hearing, the board of county commissioners shall give the public an opportunity to
be heard regarding the proposed zoning district and regulations.
(3) After the public hearing, the board of county commissioners shall review the proposals of the
planning board and make any revisions or amendments that it determines to be proper.
(4) The board of county commissioners may pass a resolution of intention to create a zoning
district and to adopt zoning regulations for the district.
(5) The board of county commissioners shall publish public notice of passage of the resolution of
intention once a week for 2 weeks in a newspaper of general circulation within the county. The notice must
state:
(a) the boundaries of the existing or proposed district;
(b) the general character of the proposed zoning regulations;
(c) that the proposed zoning regulations are on file for public inspection at the office of the county
clerk and recorder and are posted on the county's website;
(d) the county's website address where the proposed zoning regulations are available for public
inspection; and
(e) that for 30 days after first publication of this notice, the board of county commissioners will
receive written comments on the creation of the zoning district or to the zoning regulations from persons owning
real property within the district whose names appear on the most recently completed assessment roll of the
county.
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 738

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 738.1
(6) Within 30 days after the expiration of the comment period, the board of county commissioners
may in its discretion adopt the resolution creating the zoning district or establishing the zoning regulations for
the district.

Section 2. Section 76-2-205, MCA, is amended to read:
"76-2-205. Procedure for adoption of regulations and boundaries. The board of county
commissioners shall observe the following procedures in the establishment or revision of boundaries for zoning
districts and in the adoption or amendment of zoning regulations:
(1) Notice of a public hearing on the proposed zoning district boundaries and of regulations for the
zoning district must:
(a) state the following:
(i) the boundaries of the existing or proposed district;
(ii) the general character of the proposed zoning regulations;
(iii) the date, time, and place of the public hearing;
(iv) the name, address, and telephone number of the person or office that may be contacted for
further information on the action to be taken;
(iv)(v) that the proposed zoning regulations are on file for public inspection at the office of the county
clerk and recorder and are posted on the county's website; and
(vi) the county's website address where the proposed zoning regulations are available for public
inspection;
(b) be posted not less than 45 days before the public hearing in at least five public places,
including but not limited to public buildings and adjacent to public rights-of-way, within the proposed district; and
(c) be published once a week for 2 weeks in a newspaper of general circulation within the county;
and
(d) be mailed to all residents within the zoning district or zoning subdistrict whose addresses are
known to the county not less than 15 days and not more than 45 days prior to the public hearing through any of
the following methods:
(i) depositing the notice, properly addressed, in the United States mail with postage paid at the
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 738

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 738.1
first-class rate;
(ii) sending the notice by certified mail rather than first class;
(iii) mailing the notice at the bulk rate; or
(iv) mailing a postcard.
(2) At the public hearing, the board of county commissioners shall give the public an opportunity to
be heard regarding the proposed zoning district and regulations.
(3) After the public hearing, the board of county commissioners shall review the proposals of the
planning board and shall make any revisions or amendments that it determines to be proper.
(4) The board of county commissioners may pass a resolution of intention to create a zoning
district and to adopt zoning regulations for the district.
(5) The board of county commissioners shall publish notice of passage of the resolution of
intention once a week for 2 weeks in a newspaper of general circulation within the county. The notice must
state:
(a) the boundaries of the existing or proposed district;
(b) the general character of the proposed zoning regulations;
(c) that the proposed zoning regulations are on file for public inspection at the office of the county
clerk and recorder and are posted on the county's website;
(d) the county's website address where the proposed zoning regulations are available for public
inspection; and
(d)(e) that for 30 days after first publication of this notice, the board of county commissioners will
receive written comments on the creation of the zoning district or to the zoning regulations from persons owning
real property within the district whose names appear on the last-completed most recently completed
assessment roll of the county.
(6) Within 30 days after the expiration of the comment period, the board of county commissioners
may in its discretion adopt the resolution creating the zoning district or establishing the zoning regulations for
the district."

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – HB 738

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 738.1
integral part of Title 76, chapter 2, part 1, and the provisions of Title 76, chapter 2, part 1, apply to [section 1].

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 5 - Authorized Print Version – HB 738